Arkansas, session 2025, HB1627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1124, concerning property tax relief
for persons who have a disability or are more than sixty-five years of age,
is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) A property tax statement sent to a taxpayer shall notify the
taxpayer of the property tax relief provided under this section and Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 79.
(2) The notification provided under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section shall:
(A) Be printed in bold font or highlighted, or both, on
the property tax statement or included as an insert with the property tax
statement; and
(B) Clearly state the requirements for a taxpayer to be
eligible for the property tax relief provided under this section and Arkansas
*JLL257*
03-17-2025 12:22:36 JLL257

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1627
Constitution, Amendment 79.

/s/Barnett

































03-17-2025 12:22:36 JLL257